Utah statutes.
20A-11-704.   Statement of organization required for certain new corporations.

(1)  A corporation that is incorporated, organized, or otherwise created less than 90 days before the date of a general election shall file a statement of organization with the lieutenant governor's office before making a contribution to a political action committee or a political issues committee in association with the election.

(2)  The statement of organization shall include:

(a)  the name and street address of the corporation;

(b)  the name, street address, phone number, occupation, and title of one or more individuals that have primary decision-making authority for the corporation;

(c)  the name, street address, phone number, occupation, and title of the corporation's chief financial officer;

(d)  the name, street address, occupation, and title of all other officers or managers of the corporation; and

(e)  the name, street address, and occupation of each member of the corporation's governing and advisory boards, if any.



Enacted by Chapter 226, 2006 General Session

